New York, session 2025-2026, A5844.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 12 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 12. Detention on warrant from another jurisdiction. No person shall 4 be held in a state or local correctional facility within the state for 5 more than 3 days after when such person would have been released from 6 such facility if not for an outstanding warrant from another jurisdic- 7 tion unless such state or local correctional facility was informed that 8 the warrant is to be acted on by such other jurisdiction. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03391-01-5